Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-2709
Money transmission; license required; when; not transferable or assignable.

(1) A person may not engage in the business of money transmission or advertise, solicit, or hold such person out as providing money transmission unless the person is licensed under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) A person that is an authorized delegate of a licensee under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act acting within the scope of authority conferred by a written contract with the licensee; or

(b) A person that is exempt pursuant to section 8-2703 and does not engage in money transmission outside the scope of such exemption.

(3) A license issued under section 8-2713 is not transferable or assignable.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 14.